Hawaii statutes.
[§398-9.5] Family leave data collection
system; establishment. (a) There is established a family leave data
collection system to:

(1) Ensure that all employees covered by the benefits
of this chapter are informed of their rights under this chapter and their names
are entered into the database upon application for benefits;

(2) Collect pertinent data, consistent with state and
federal privacy statutes, on the use and potential demand for family leave
benefits for both public and private-sector employees, including information on
who and under what circumstances employees are using family leave benefits, the
nature and duration of family members' needs, and the adequacy of current
family leave benefits;

(3) Provide analysis of the data to assist in the development
and implementation of an efficient system of family leave, including potential
paid family leave, for employees in Hawaii; and

(4) Provide analysis of data to assist in the future
development of caregiver services for senior citizens in Hawaii.

(b) The department shall work with the
University of Hawaii center on aging to create a web-based data system with the
following capabilities:

(1) The capacity for all employees seeking family
leave benefits under this chapter to log into the data system and enter
pertinent data on the circumstances and need for family leave benefits;

(2) The ability to secure confidential information,
consistent with state and federal privacy statutes, available only in aggregate
form for managers and analysts of the data system;

(3) The ability of the employee to print out a simple
form to be submitted to the employer certifying that required data has been
entered;

(4) The ability of data managers and analysts to
manipulate and query the database to achieve the purpose of this chapter;

(5) A back-up paper system that can be used when
computer access or printing is unavailable; and

(6) A user-friendly format that can be translated
into multiple languages for employees.

(c) The state auditor shall be provided access
to the database and shall prepare annual reports to the legislature, the
department, and the University of Hawaii center on aging. [L Sp 2009, c 7, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next